Utah statutes.
41-1a-107.   Commission, division, and officers to enforce chapter --
Duties.
The commission and the officers and inspectors of the division designated by
the commission, peace officers, and others authorized by the division or by
law shall:
(1)  enforce the provisions of this chapter and of all other laws regulating
the registration of motor vehicles, trailers, or semitrailers; and
(2)  inspect any motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer of a type required to
be registered in any public garage or repair shop or in any place where the
motor vehicle, trailer, or semitrailer is held for sale or wrecking, for the
purpose of locating and investigating the title and registration of stolen
motor vehicles, trailers, and semitrailers.
